Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

Soil Conservation Associations

43-14-301. County legislative body authorized to purchase terracing equipment — Conditions.

Where there is organized in a county a soil conservation association, whose membership shall comprise bona fide landowners, incorporated under the Cooperative Marketing Law, compiled in chapter 16 of this title; and when sufficient members of the association have agreed with the association by written contract to pay their proportionate share of the cost of terracing, including operating cost and retirement of the original purchase price of the terracing equipment, a minimum total of five thousand (5,000) acres; and when the authorizing officers of the association have petitioned the county legislative body with proper evidence that bona fide landowners in the county desire to have a minimum of five thousand (5,000) acres terraced and pay their proportionate share of the cost of constructing the terraces, including the retirement of the original purchase price of the terracing equipment, the county legislative body is authorized within its own discretion to make an appropriation for the purchase of terracing equipment for use on farm lands in the county, and on farms of the members of the association, and the county legislative body shall be reimbursed for the original cost of the equipment through the payment by each member of the association of that member's proportionate share of the cost of the equipment, including operating cost for each acre of land terraced.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.14 (Williams, § 584.10); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1601.

Cross-References. Agricultural District and Farmland Preservation Act, title 43, ch. 34.

Chickasaw Basin authority cooperation with county soil conservation districts and conservation boards, § 64-1-210.

Cooperative marketing associations, § 43-16-102.

County appropriations for soil conservation purposes, § 5-9-106.

Flood control authorities, title 64, chapter 3.

Watershed areas, title 69, ch. 6.

West Tennessee river basin authority cooperation with county soil conservation districts, § 64-1-1107.

43-14-302. Pulverizing lime — Purchase and lease of equipment and quarries.

Where there is organized in a county a county soil conservation association, whose membership shall comprise bona fide landowners incorporated under the Cooperative Marketing Law, compiled in chapter 16 of this title; and when the members of the association have agreed with the association by written contract to pay their proportionate share of the cost of producing a minimum of two thousand (2,000) tons of pulverized lime; and when the authorized officers of the association have petitioned the county legislative body with proper evidence that bona fide landowners in the county desire to use a minimum of two thousand (2,000) tons of pulverized lime and will pay their proportionate share of the cost of production, the county legislative body is authorized, within its own discretion, to make an appropriation for the purchase and to purchase equipment for the pulverizing of lime to be used on farm lands in the county and on farms of members of the association. The county legislative body is further authorized, within its own discretion, to make appropriation for the leasing or purchasing of quarries or limestone deposits for the manufacture of pulverized lime.

In the event the lime pulverizing equipment is purchased and quarries or limestone deposits are leased or purchased, the county legislative body is authorized in its discretion to:

Pulverize, manufacture and produce lime for sale to the farmers of the county on such terms and conditions as the county should deem proper; and

Lease or sell the lime pulverizing equipment and/or quarries to the association on such terms and conditions as the county legislative body deems proper.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 2-A, as added by Acts 1937 (3rd E. S.), ch. 5, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.15 (Williams, § 584.10a); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1602.

43-14-303. Analyzing soil for lime and phosphate content — Purchase of equipment.

Where there is organized in the county a soil conservation association whose membership shall comprise bona fide landowners incorporated under the Cooperative Marketing Law, compiled in chapter 16 of this title, and when sufficient members of the association shall have agreed with the association by written contract to pay their proportionate share of the cost of purchasing equipment for analyzing soil for lime and phosphate content, the county legislative body is authorized, in its own discretion, to make an appropriation for the purchase of such equipment for use on farm lands of members of the association, and the county legislative body shall be reimbursed for the original cost of the equipment through the payment by each member of the association of that member's proportionate share of the cost of the equipment.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 2-B, as added by Acts 1937 (3rd E. S.), ch. 5, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.16 (Williams, § 584.10b); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1603.

43-14-304. Organization with aid of University of Tennessee extension service.

Farmers in a county desiring to organize a soil conservation association in order to participate in the benefits of this part shall request the advice and help of the University of Tennessee extension, in the organization and incorporation of such association.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.17 (Williams, § 584.11); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1604; Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee extension service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the act.

43-14-305. Purchase of terracing equipment with advice of extension service.

Before a county soil conservation association shall petition a county legislative body for aid in the purchase of terracing equipment, the officers of the association shall seek advice from the extension service, and particularly, its rural engineers, on the type of equipment that would prove most efficient in the county, and the equipment shall be approved by the foregoing engineers for the county.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.18 (Williams, § 584.12); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1605; Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee extension service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the act.

43-14-306. Only equipment recommended to be purchased.

Only terracing equipment recommended by the soil conservation association shall be purchased with any funds appropriated by the county legislative body for the purposes set forth in this part.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.19 (Williams, § 584.13); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1606.

43-14-307. Operators of terracing equipment — Salaries.

The soil conservation association shall employ only competent trained operators for terracing equipment, and their salaries shall be charged as a part of the operating cost of the equipment.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.20 (Williams, § 584.14); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1607.

43-14-308. Terracing specifications of agricultural engineer to be followed.

All terracing work done, to qualify for payment under the federal Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, shall be in accordance with specifications prescribed by the agricultural engineer of the University of Tennessee extension.

Acts 1937 (2nd E. S.), ch. 5, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.21 (Williams, § 584.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1608; Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. The Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 16 U.S.C. §§ 590a — 590q-3.

Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee Extension Service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the act.